Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska23-3802
Terms, defined.

For purposes of the Black-Tailed Prairie
Dog Management Act:

(1) Colony means the series
of burrows and tunnels created by the black-tailed prairie dog where black-tailed
prairie dogs live;

(2)
County board means the county board of commissioners or supervisors of a county
that has adopted the act;

(3)
Managed colony means a colony that is confined to land owned by one person;
and

(4)
Person means any individual, partnership, firm, limited liability company,
corporation, company, society, or association, the state or any department,
agency, or political subdivision thereof, or any other public or private entity.

Laws 2012, LB473, § 2.